Missouri, session 2026, SB1008.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 27.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 27.020,
to read as follows:
27.020. 1. The attorney general is hereby authorized
to appoint such assistant attorneys general as may be
necessary to properly perform the duties of his or her
office and shall fix the compensation of such assistants
within the limits of the amount appropriated by the general
assembly. Said assistant attorneys general shall hold their
office at the pleasure of the attorney general, shall
possess the same qualifications as the attorney general, and
before entering upon the discharge of their duties shall
each take and subscribe to an oath to support the
Constitution of the United States and of the state of
Missouri and to faithfully demean themselves in office. It
shall be their duty to assist the attorney general in his or
her official duties with power and authority under his or
her direction to represent him or her in the discharge of
all the duties of his or her office.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1008 2
2. The attorney general may, at the request of any
officer, department, board, bureau, commission or agency of
the state, assign assistant attorneys general to perform the
duties prescribed by law before or upon behalf of such
officer, department, board, bureau, commission or agency and
may, upon request as aforesaid, from time to time reassign
such assistants.
3. The attorney general is also authorized to appoint
a chief clerk, stenographers, typists, clerks,
[investigators] and such other employees as shall be
necessary to properly perform the duties of his or her
office [and shall fix the compensation of persons thus
employed within the limits of the amount appropriated by the
general assembly.] Said employees shall serve during the
pleasure of the attorney general. [The assistant attorneys
general and the chief clerk, stenographers, typists, clerks,
investigators and other employees shall be paid in the same
manner and at the same time as the attorney general. The
compensation and expenses of said assistants and employees
may be paid out of any state or federal funds appropriated
to said department for such purposes].
4. The attorney general is further authorized to
appoint commissioned and noncommissioned investigators, as
shall be necessary to properly perform the duties of his or
her office. Investigators shall serve at the pleasure of
the attorney general. Each commissioned investigator, upon
appointment, shall take and subscribe an oath of office to
support the constitution and laws of the United States and
the state of Missouri and shall receive a certificate of
appointment, a copy of which shall be filed with the
secretary of state, issued by the attorney general or his or
her designee granting such commissioned investigator all the

SB 1008 3
same powers of arrest held by peace officers to maintain
order and preserve the peace in any matter in which the
attorney general is appointed or assigned in accordance with
the law. Commissioned investigators may assist law
enforcement agencies when requested. The certificate of
appointment of each commissioned investigator may be
withdrawn at any time by the attorney general. Commissioned
investigators shall comply with all peace officer standards
required by chapter 590.
5. The attorney general is authorized to fix the
compensation of persons employed by him or her within the
limits of the amount appropriated by the general assembly.
The assistant attorneys general and the chief clerk,
stenographers, typists, clerks, investigators, and other
employees shall be paid in the same manner and at the same
time as the attorney general. The compensation and expenses
of said assistants, investigators, and other employees may
be paid out of any state or federal funds appropriated to
said department for such purposes.
✓